src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v1
+Inf:a # ;
+Ind+Prs:ar # ;
+Ind+Prt:ade # ;
+Sup:at # ;
+PrfPtc:t # ;

LEXICON v2
+Inf:a # ;
+Ind+Prs:er # ;
+Ind+Prt:de # ; ! te after unvoiced
+Sup:t # ;
+PrfPtc:d # ;

LEXICON v3
+Inf: # ;
+Ind+Prs:r # ;
+Ind+Prt:dde # ;
+Sup:tt # ;
+PrfPtc:dd # ;
